Hawaii statutes.
§468L-2 Registration and renewal. (a)
A travel agency shall register with the director prior to engaging in the
business of selling or advertising to sell travel services.

(b) Each travel agency shall renew its
registration on or before December 31 of each odd-numbered year. A statement
on a form designed and provided by the department verifying that the practices
of the travel agency are in accordance with section 468L-5, shall be filed with
the renewal.

(c) A travel agency that sells activities individually
or as part of a tour package shall register with the director as an activity
desk under section 468M-2. [L 1991, c 285, pt of §1; am L 1992, c 157, §1; am L
1997, c 40, §21; am L 2016, c 148, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next